apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="h/alde__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>aldi</l>  <r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alden</l> <r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>  <r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aldi</l>  <r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aldne</l> <r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aldne</l> <r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aldande</l><r>alde<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>aldt</l>  <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ald</l>   <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alda</l>  <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>  <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aldast</l><r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>  <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aldi</l>  <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eld</l>   <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elder</l> <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eldt</l>  <r>alde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vørd/e__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ekke__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>okki</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekt</l>   <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okken</l> <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekt</l>   <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okke</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>okki</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekte</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okne</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekte</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okne</l>  <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkande</l><r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ekk</l>   <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekka</l>  <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekke</l>  <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekkast</l><r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekt</l>   <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okke</l>  <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>okki</l>  <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekker</l> <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ekk</l>   <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akk</l>   <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekte</l>  <r>ekke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kl/inge__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ungi</l>  <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungen</l> <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>  <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ungi</l>  <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungne</l> <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungne</l> <r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingande</l><r>inge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>   <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inga</l>  <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>  <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingast</l><r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>  <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ungi</l>  <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>   <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>   <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="friskmelde">      <i>friskmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="påmelde">         <i>påmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="melde">           <i>meld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjukmelde">       <i>sjukmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjukemelde">      <i>sjukemeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="byggemelde">      <i>byggemeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innmelde">        <i>innmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="endevende">   <i>endevend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avvende">     <i>avvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tverrvende">  <i>tverrvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="unngjelde">   <i>unngjeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bende">       <i>bend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kuvende">     <i>kuvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vørde">       <i>vørd</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="omvende">     <i>omvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bråvende">    <i>bråvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjengjelde">  <i>gjengjeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ettersende">  <i>ettersend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vanvørde">    <i>vanvørd</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stagvende">   <i>stagvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svivørde">    <i>svivørd</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="innvende">    <i>innvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vende">           <i>vend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hende">           <i>hend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rekke">           <i>r</i><par n="r/ekke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sende">           <i>send</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innehalde">       <i>inneh</i><par n="h/alde__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="halde">           <i>h</i><par n="h/alde__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overhalde">           <i>overh</i><par n="h/alde__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bodsende">        <i>bodsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klekke"><i>kl</i><par n="r/ekke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klinge"><i>kl</i><par n="kl/inge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="småspringe"><i>småspr</i><par n="kl/inge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sprekke"><i>spr</i><par n="r/ekke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="springe"><i>spr</i><par n="kl/inge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vidaresende">     <i>vidaresend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="framhalde">           <i>framh</i><par n="h/alde__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forhalde">           <i>forh</i><par n="h/alde__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppretthalde">           <i>oppretth</i><par n="h/alde__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skademelde"><i>skademeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="politianmelde"><i>politianmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="etteranmelde"><i>etteranmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="incestanmelde"><i>incestanmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyinnmelde"><i>nyinnmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utmelde"><i>utmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fagpåmelde"><i>fagpåmeld</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilbakesende">           <i>tilbakesend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilsende">           <i>tilsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="heimsende">           <i>heimsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="omsende">           <i>omsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innsende">           <i>innsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="oversende">           <i>oversend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvangssende">           <i>tvangssend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hitsende">           <i>hitsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utsende">           <i>utsend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sende">           <i>send</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="eggvende">           <i>eggvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="speglvende">           <i>speglvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilvende">           <i>tilvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="henvende">           <i>henvend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vende">           <i>vend</i><par n="vørd/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
